Idaho, session 2026, S1332.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE STRATEGIC INITIATIVES PROGRAM FUND TO
THE GENERAL FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State
Controller shall transfer $45,000,000 from the Strategic Initiatives Pro-
gram Fund to the General Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM AC-
COUNT TO THE GENERAL FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the
State Controller shall transfer $3,000,000 from the Opportunity Scholarship
Program Account to the General Fund as soon as practicable for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE PERMANENT BUILDING FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $33,745,000 from the Permanent Building Fund to the
General Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June
30, 2026.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE WATER POLLUTION CONTROL FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $15,000,000 from the Water Pollution Control Fund to
the General Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE IN-DEMAND CAREERS FUND TO THE GENERAL
FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer $10,000,000 from the In-Demand Careers Fund to the General
Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026.


SECTION 6. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE IN-DEMAND CAREERS FUND TO THE GENERAL
FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer $10,000,000 from the In-Demand Careers Fund to the General
Fund once awards have been obligated and reconciled on December 31, 2026, or
as soon thereafter as practicable.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 through 5 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Section 6 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.